Nebraska, session 109, LB211.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB211 LB211
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 13-3403, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
13-3403 (1) Except as otherwise provided in the Property Tax Growth
Limitation Act, for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025, a
political subdivision's property tax request for any year shall not
exceed its property tax request authority as determined under this
section. The preliminary property tax request authority for each
political subdivision shall be the amount of property taxes levied by the
county board of equalization pursuant to section 77-1601 for such
political subdivision in the prior fiscal year, less the sum of
exceptions utilized in the prior year pursuant to section 13-3404.
(2) In addition to the preliminary property tax request authority,
the political subdivision's property tax request authority may be
increased as follows by the product of:
(a) If public safety services as defined in section 13-320 account
for twenty percent or more of the amount of the political subdivision's
budget funded by property taxes, such political subdivision's property
tax request authority may be increased by:
(i) The product of (A) the amount of property taxes levied in the
prior year, less the sum of exceptions utilized in the prior year
pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2) of section 13-3404 and (B) the
political subdivision's growth percentage; and
(ii) The product of (A) the amount of property taxes levied in the
prior year, less the sum of exceptions utilized in the prior year
pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2) of section 13-3404 and (B) the
greater of zero or the inflation percentage; or
(b) If public safety services as defined in section 13-320 account
for less than twenty percent of the amount of the political subdivision's
budget funded by property taxes, such political subdivision's property
tax request authority may be increased by:
(i) The product of (A) the amount of property taxes levied in the
-2-

LB211 LB211
2025 2025
prior year, less the sum of exceptions utilized in the prior year
pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2) of section 13-3404 and (B) the
political subdivision's growth percentage; and
(ii) The product of (A) the amount of property taxes levied in the
prior year, less the sum of exceptions utilized in the prior year
pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2) of section 13-3404 and (B) the
greater of two percent or the inflation percentage.
(a) The amount of property taxes levied in the prior year increased
by the political subdivision's growth percentage, less the sum of
exceptions utilized in the prior year pursuant to subdivisions (1) and
(2) of section 13-3404; and
(b) The greater of zero or the inflation percentage.
Sec. 2. Original section 13-3403, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-3-